Washington statutes.
RCW 21.40.040

Amount of award limited.

If the securities administrator determines to make one or more awards under RCW 21.40.020, the aggregate amount of awards that may be awarded in connection with an administrative or judicial action may not be less than 10 percent nor more than 30 percent of the monetary sanctions imposed and collected in the related administrative or judicial action.

[ 2023 c 149 s 5.]